North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-09 Brands and Marks [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8]

Effective Date.

The repeal of this chapter by section 8 of chapter 72, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

See now N.D.C.C. ch. 4.1-73, Branding Livestock.

36-09-01.
Office for recording brands. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-02.
Application for exclusive use of brand or mark. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-02.1.
Standards for recording brands or marks.

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-03.
Exclusive use of brand or mark on poultry — How obtained. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 287, § 24.

Note.

Section 24 of chapter 287, S.L. 2003, repealed this section effective July 1, 2003.

36-09-04.
Record of brands kept — Inspection of record — Certificate of brand ownership. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-05.
Similar brands may not be recorded — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 429, § 5.

36-09-06.
Cancellation of brand. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-07.
Venting of brand upon sale of stock — How made — Prima facie evidence. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1949, ch. 229, § 4.

36-09-08.
Official brandbooks to be presumptive evidence.

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-09.
Cancellation of brands — Rerecording — Limitation on brands. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-09.1.
Cancellation of brands — Updated rerecording — Limitation on brands. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-10.
Failure to rerecord brand — Abandonment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-11.
Notice of expiration of brand to be given. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-12.
Publication of notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-13.
Recording and rerecording of brands — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-13.1.
Use of unrecorded brand — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-14.
Chief brand inspector to issue brandbook. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-15.
Butcher to keep record of branded cattle slaughtered — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-16.
Branding of stock running at large unlawful — Exception — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

36-09-17.
Defacing brands and unlawfully branding — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-18.
Collection of fees — Discrimination prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-19.
Effect of registered brand or mark — Bill of sale to be given and kept. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-20.
Bill of sale to be given and kept — Copy with shipment — Effect — Penalty.

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 73, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

36-09-20.1.
False proof of ownership — Sale of livestock — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-20.2.
Proof of ownership — Alteration or falsification — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-21.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

36-09-22.
Sale of animal under false registration certificate — Changing marking — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-23.
Transportation of livestock from state — Brand inspection — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-24.
Police powers of chief brand inspector and fieldmen. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-25.
Animal identification program — Administration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-26.
Brand inspection services — Out-of-state facilities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-27.
Reinspection request — Responsibility for costs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-09-28.
Premises and animal identification program — Open records — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.